Wisconsin, session 2025, SB611.
do enact as follows:SB611,11Section 1. 118.164 (title) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB611,2,22118.164 (title) Authority to manage a class; teachers.SB611,23Section 2. 118.164 (1) (title) of the statutes is created to read:SB611,2,44118.164 (1) (title) Definitions.SB611,35Section 3. 118.164 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 118.164 (1) (intro.) and 6amended to read:SB611,2,77118.164 (1) (intro.) In this section, “teacher”:SB611,2,108(e) “Teacher” means a person holding a license or permit issued by the state 9superintendent whose employment by a school district requires that he or she hold 10that license or permit.SB611,411Section 4. 118.164 (1) (a), (b), (c), (d) and (f) of the statutes are created to 12read:SB611,2,1513118.164 (1) (a) “Behavior intervention plan” means an individualized plan 14created for a pupil with an identified behavior of concern and that satisfies all of the 15following criteria:SB611,2,16161. The plan clearly identifies the pupil’s behavior of concern.SB611,3,112. The plan identifies specific goals related to the pupil’s behavior of concern.SB611,3,323. The plan describes the strategies and supports that will be used for the 3pupil to meet the goals described in the plan.SB611,3,544. The plan includes a description of how the pupil’s progress will be 5monitored and how the plan will be adjusted, if needed.SB611,3,965. If the pupil is a child with a disability, as defined in s. 115.76 (5) (a), and the 7pupil’s behavior of concern affects the pupil’s learning or the learning of other 8pupils, the plan is created during the individualized education program process, in 9accordance with 34 CFR § 300.320 (a).SB611,3,1010(b) “Disruptive behavior” has the meaning given in s. 118.1645 (1) (b).SB611,3,1111(c) “Disruptive incident” has the meaning given in s. 118.1645 (1) (c).SB611,3,1312(d) “Materially and substantially interrupts instruction or compromises 13safety” has the meaning given in s. 118.1645 (1) (d).SB611,3,1414(f) “Violent incident” has the meaning given in s. 118.1645 (1) (g).SB611,515Section 5. 118.164 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB611,3,1616118.164 (1m) Authority. A teacher may do any of the following:SB611,3,1717(a) Maintain order and discipline in the teacher’s classroom.SB611,3,1818(b) Establish and enforce classroom rules.SB611,3,1919(c) Call 911 in the event of an emergency.SB611,3,2120(d) In accordance with s. 118.305, take immediate action to stop a pupil’s 21disruptive behavior.SB611,3,2322(e) Request immediate assistance from school administrators for a pupil’s 23disruptive behavior or a disruptive or violent incident.SB611,624Section 6. 118.164 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB611,4,141118.164 (2) Removal from class. Subject to 20 USC 1415 (k) and beginning 2August 1, 1999, a teacher may remove a pupil from the teacher’s class if the pupil 3violates the code of classroom conduct adopted under s. 120.13 (1) (a) or is 4dangerous, unruly or disruptive or exhibits behavior that interferes with the ability 5of the teacher to teach effectively, as specified in the code of classroom conduct, 6engages in disruptive behavior, causes or participates in a disruptive or violent 7incident, materially and substantially interrupts instruction or compromises safety, 8or repeatedly refuses to comply with classroom rules despite prior intervention. 9The teacher shall send the pupil to the school principal or his or her the school 10principal’s designee and notify the school principal or his or her the school 11principal’s designee immediately of the reasons for the removal. In addition, the 12teacher shall provide to the school principal or his or her the school principal’s 13designee within 24 hours after the pupil’s removal from the class a written 14explanation of the reasons for the removal.SB611,715Section 7. 118.164 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:SB611,4,1916118.164 (2m) Review of removal. The school principal or the school 17principal’s designee shall act on each removal under sub. (2) in accordance with the 18school board’s policy under s. 118.1645 (4) and the school board’s code of classroom 19conduct under s. 120.13 (1) (a). Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb611 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb611 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB611 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB611 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB611: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting